Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-131 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any


means, of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus


within the borders of this state into the atmosphere with express


purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of


sunlight is prohibited.


B. The Governor may direct the Oklahoma Air National Guard to


interdict, document identification tail numbers, secure photographic

Req. No. 16 Page 1


evidence, sample aerosolized effluents or particulate, utilize mass


spectrometers and other appropriate scientific instrumentation, and


engage with aircraft violating this section to escort them to the


nearest airport for investigation, securing of evidence, and


documentation of violation.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 82 O.S. 2021, Sections 1087.1,


1087.2, 1087.3, 1087.4, 1087.5, 1087.6, 1087.7, 1087.8, 1087.9,


1087.10, 1087.11, 1087.12, 1087.13, 1087.14, 1087.15, 1087.16,


1087.17, 1087.18, 1087.19, 1087.20, 1801.1, 1801.2, and 1801.4, are


hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-16 RD 1/16/2025 2:26:23 PM























Req. No. 16 Page 2